GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/italian.lexc
LEXICON V11E3	0:i		V00E3;
LEXICON V11E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V11E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V11E6	0:ino		V00E6;
LEXICON V11E	V11E1; V11E2; V11E3; V11E4; V11E5; V11E6;

LEXICON V11F1	0:iassi		V00F1;
LEXICON V11F2	0:iassi		V00F2;
LEXICON V11F3	0:iasse		V00F3;
LEXICON V11F4	0:iassimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V11F5	0:iaste		V00F5;
LEXICON V11F6	0:iassero	V00F6;
LEXICON V11F	V11F1; V11F2; V11F3; V11F4; V11F5; V11F6;

LEXICON V11G1	0:ierei		V00G1;
LEXICON V11G2	0:ieresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V11G3	0:ierebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V11G4	0:ieremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V11G5	0:iereste	V00G5;
LEXICON V11G6	0:ierebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V11G	V11G1; V11G2; V11G3; V11G4; V11G5; V11G6;

LEXICON V11H	0:iant		V00H;
LEXICON V11I	0:iat		V00I;	
LEXICON V11L	0:iando		V00L;	
LEXICON V11M	0:iare		V00M;
	
LEXICON V11N2	0:ia		V00N2;
LEXICON V11N3	0:i		V00N3;
LEXICON V11N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V11N5	0:iate		V00N5;
LEXICON V11N6	0:ino		V00N6;
LEXICON V11N	V11N2; V11N3; V11N4; V11N5; V11N6;

LEXICON V11	V11A; V11B; V11C; V11D; V11E; V11F; V11G; 
		V11H; V11I; V11L; V11M; V11N;



! added for enclitics

LEXICON OPTCLITIC	#; 	CLITIC;

LEXICON CLITIC
^=io+Pron+Acc+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:mi		# ;
^=tu+Pron+Acc+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:ti		# ;
^=lui+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Masc+Sg:lo	# ;
^=lui+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg:la	# ;
^=noi+Pron+Acc+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ci		# ;
^=voi+Pron+Acc+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:vi		# ;
^=loro+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Masc+Pl:li	# ;
^=loro+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Fem+Pl:le	# ;

^=io+Pron+Dat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:mi 		#;
^=tu+Pron+Dat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:ti		# ;
^=lui+Pron+Dat+Aton+3P+Masc+Sg:gli	# ;
^=lui+Pron+Dat+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg:le	# ;
^=noi+Pron+Dat+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ci		# ;
^=voi+Pron+Dat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:vi		# ; 

^=ne+Pron+Ne+MF+SP:ne			# ;

^=io+Pron+Dat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:me 		CLITIC2;
^=tu+Pron+Dat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:te		CLITIC2;
^=lui+Pron+Dat+Aton+3P+MF+Sg:glie	CLITIC2;
^=noi+Pron+Dat+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ce		CLITIC2;
^=voi+Pron+Dat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:ve		CLITIC2;
^=si+Pron+Refl+Aton+3P+MF+SP:se		CLITIC2;

^=io+Pron+Acc+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:me		CLITIC1;
^=tu+Pron+Acc+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:te		CLITIC1;
^=noi+Pron+Acc+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ce		CLITIC1;
^=voi+Pron+Acc+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:ve		CLITIC1;

^=ci+Adv:ci				# ;     !"andarci" ("to go there")
^=vi+Adv:vi				# ;     !"portandoci" ("by bringing there")

^=ci+Pron+Dem:ci			# ;     !"vuoi riprovarci?" ("do you want to try it again")
^=vi+Pron+Dem:vi			# ;     !"pensaci!" ("think about [it]")

^=ci+Adv:ce				CLITIC2;
^=vi+Adv:ve      			CLITIC2;

^=si+Pron+Refl+Aton+3P+MF+SP:si		# ;  

LEXICON CLITIC1
^=ne+Pron+Ne+MF+SP:ne             	# ;
^=ne+Adv:ne             		# ;

LEXICON CLITIC2		
					CLITIC1; 
^=lui+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Masc+Sg:lo	# ;
^=lui+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg:la	# ;
^=loro+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Masc+Pl:li	# ;
^=loro+Pron+Acc+Aton+3P+Fem+Pl:le	# ;

!NOUN
!
!CLASSE   0  1  2  3  4  5  6  7  8  9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20  21
!
!SING MAS -     o  o     o io     e  a  e     a     o  a  a  e  e  o  o tore
!      
!     FEM -  a     a  a       ia     a     e    ie        a  e  a  a  a trice
!
!PLUR MAS -     i  i    hi  i        i  i    hi        i hi  i  i  i hi tori
!       
!     FEM -  e     e he        e  i  e     i     i  a    he  i  e he he trici
!
!* Class 0 s used fur uninflected nouns (es. caffe`, boia) and for nouns
!  lacking the singular or the plural (es. nozze, pepe)
!* To introduce nouns having different plural forms (es. sing: 
!  braccio, pl: bracci braccia) or different singular forms (es. sing: arma arme, 
!  pl: armi) two separate entries are required in the lexicon.

LEXICON N00MSG	< %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON N00FSG	< %+Fem:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON N00MPL	< %+Masc:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON N00FPL	< %+Fem:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;


LEXICON N00M	N00MSG; N00MPL;
LEXICON N00F	N00FSG; N00FPL;
LEXICON N00SG	N00FSG; N00MSG;
LEXICON N00PL	N00FPL; N00MPL;
LEXICON N00	N00M; N00F;

LEXICON N01	0:a	N00FSG;
		0:e	N00FPL;

LEXICON N02	0:o	N00MSG;
		0:i	N00MPL;

LEXICON N03	N01;	N02;

LEXICON N04	0:a	N00FSG;
		0:he	N00FPL;

LEXICON N05	0:o	N00MSG;
		0:hi	N00MPL;

LEXICON N06	0:io	N00MSG;
		0:i	N00MPL;

LEXICON N07	0:ia	N00FSG;
		0:e	N00FPL;

! modified by AS:	NOT USED ??
LEXICON N08	0:a	N00MSG;	! belga
		0:a	N00FSG;	! belga
		0:i	N00MPL;	! belgi
		0:he	N00FPL;	! belghe	

LEXICON N09	0:a	N00MSG;
		0:a	N00FSG;
		0:i	N00MPL;
		0:e	N00FPL;

LEXICON N10	0:e	N00MSG;
		0:i	N00MPL;

LEXICON N11	0:e	N00FSG;
		0:i	N00FPL;

LEXICON N12	0:a	N00MSG;
		0:hi	N00MPL;

LEXICON N13	0:ie	N00FSG;
		0:i	N00FPL;

! ???
LEXICON N14	0:o	N00MSG;
		0:i	N00MPL;
		0:a	N00FPL;

LEXICON N15	0:a	N00MSG;
		0:i	N00MPL;

LEXICON N16	N12; N04;
LEXICON N17	N10; N11;
LEXICON N18	N10; N01;
LEXICON N19	N02; N04;
LEXICON N20	N05; N04;

LEXICON N21	0:tore	N00MSG;
		0:trice	N00FSG;
		0:tori	N00MPL;
		0:trici	N00FPL;

!ADJ             0    1    2    3    4    5    6    7    8    
!
!SING MASCH      -    o    e   io    o    o   io    a    a
!
!    FEMM       -    a    e   ia    a    a   ia    a    a
!
!PLUR MASCH      -    i    i    i   hi    i    i    i    i
!
!     FEMM       -    e    i    e   he   he   ie    e   he
!
!
!
! * Class 0 is used for irregular adjectives (es. bel,gran ..)

LEXICON A00MSG	< %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON A00FSG	< %+Fem:0 %+Sg:0 >	#;
LEXICON A00MPL	< %+Masc:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;
LEXICON A00FPL	< %+Fem:0 %+Pl:0 >	#;

!# added
LEXICON ASUP	+Sup:issim	A01a;
LEXICON AADV	^|+Adv:mente	#;


LEXICON A00M	A00MSG; A00MPL;
LEXICON A00F	A00FSG; A00FPL;
LEXICON A00SG	A00FSG; A00MSG;
LEXICON A00PL	A00FPL; A00MPL;
LEXICON A00	A00M; A00F;


LEXICON A01a	0:o	A00MSG;
		0:a	A00FSG;
		0:i	A00MPL;
		0:e	A00FPL;
		0:a	AADV;
LEXICON A01	A01a; ASUP;


LEXICON A02a	0:e	A00MSG;
		0:e	A00FSG;
		0:i	A00MPL;
		0:i	A00FPL;
		0	AADV;
LEXICON A02	A02a; ASUP;

LEXICON A02comp	+Comp:e	A00MSG;
		+Comp:e	A00FSG;
		+Comp:0	A00MSG;
		+Comp:0	A00FSG;
		+Comp:i	A00MPL;
		+Comp:i	A00FPL;
		+Comp:0	AADV;


LEXICON A03a	0:io	A00MSG;
		0:ia	A00FSG;
		0:i	A00MPL;
		0:e	A00FPL;
		0:ia	AADV;
LEXICON A03	A03a; ASUP;


LEXICON A04a	0:o	A00MSG;
		0:a	A00FSG;
		0:hi	A00MPL;
		0:he	A00FPL;
		0:a	AADV;
LEXICON A04	A04a; ASUP;


LEXICON A05a	0:o	A00MSG;
		0:a	A00FSG;
		0:i	A00MPL;
		0:he	A00FPL;
LEXICON A05	A05a; ASUP;


LEXICON A06a	0:io	A00MSG;
		0:ia	A00FSG;
		0:i	A00MPL;
		0:ie	A00FPL;
		0:ia	AADV;
LEXICON A06	A06a; ASUP;


LEXICON A07a	0:a	A00MSG;
		0:a	A00FSG;
		0:i	A00MPL;
		0:e	A00FPL;
		0:a	AADV;
LEXICON A07	A07a; ASUP;


LEXICON A08a	0:a	A00MSG;
		0:a	A00FSG;
		0:i	A00MPL;
		0:he	A00FPL;
		0:a	AADV;
LEXICON A08	A08a; ASUP;

LEXICON MAIN
belga+Adj:belg	A08;
bello+Adj:bei	A00MPL;		!AS@26/08/2008
bello+Adj:begli	A00MPL;		!AS@26/08/2008
bello+Adj:bell'	A00MSG;		!AS@26/08/2008
breccia+Noun:brecc	N07;
bruco+Noun:bruc	N05;
budello+Noun:budell	N14;
cagnesco+Adj:cagnesc	A04;
calmante+Noun:calmant	N10;
capobanda+Noun:capobanda	N00SG;
capomafia+Noun:capomafia	N00MSG;
caporeparto+Noun:capireparto	N00MPL;
capostazione+Noun:capostazione	N00MSG;
capotavola+Noun:capitavola	N00MPL;
cardo+Noun:card	N02;
carisma+Noun:carism	N15;
cavalluccio+Noun:cavallucc	N06;
cecchino+Noun:cecchin	N03;
celata+Noun:celat	N01;
celestialità+Noun:celestialità	N00F;
centinaio+Noun:centinai	N14;
ciclico+Adj:ciclic	A05;
cilecca+Noun:cilecc	N04;
cinemascope+Noun:cinemascope	N00M;
cipriota+Adj:cipriot	A07;
cocco+Noun:cocc	N20;
collega+Noun:colleg	N16;
col+Noun:col	N00MSG;
comatoso+Adj:comatos	A01;
combattente+Noun:combattent	N17;
conciliare+Verb+Trans:concil	V11;
condensatore+Noun:condensator	N10;
coniazione+Noun:coniazion	N11;
contraddittorio+Adj:contraddittor	A06;
contribuente+Noun:contribuent	N17;
coprifuoco+Noun:coprifuoc	N05;
corno+Noun:corn	N14;
costituzionale+Adj:costituzional	A02;
criminologo+Noun:criminolog	N19;
crucco+Noun:crucc	N20;
culturista+Noun:culturist	N09;
dabbene+Adj:dabbene	A00;
dannato+Noun:dannat	N03;
dispetto+Noun:dispett	N02;
dittatore+Noun:ditta	N21;
diversità+Noun:diversità	N00F;
dramma+Noun:dramm	N15;
drammaturgo+Noun:drammaturg	N20;
duca+Noun:duc	N12;
duecentesco+Adj:duecentesc	A04;
eccitazione+Noun:eccitazion	N11;
eclissi+Noun:ecliss	N00FSG;
eco+Noun:echi	N00MPL;
eco+Noun:eco	N00SG;
efficienza+Noun:efficienz	N01;
emorroidi+Noun:emorroidi	N00FPL;
erbivoro+Adj:erbivor	A01;
escatologico+Adj:escatologic	A05;
espressionista+Adj:espressionist	A07;
esproprio+Noun:espropr	N06;
esteriore+Adj:esterior	A02comp;
etnologo+Noun:etnolog	N19;
evangelista+Noun:evangelist	N15;
falsopiano+Noun:falsopiano	N00MSG;
fannullone+Noun:fannullon	N18;
feci+Noun:feci	N00FPL;
fisarmonica+Noun:fisarmonic	N04;
focaccia+Noun:focacc	N07;
fon+Noun:fon	N00M;
frigio+Adj:frig	A06;
fuggiasco+Noun:fuggiasc	N16;
fuoriclasse+Noun:fuoriclasse	N00;
gerarca+Noun:gerarc	N12;
glottologo+Noun:glottolog	N19;
gonfiare+Verb+Trans:gonf	V11;
granduca+Noun:granduc	N12;
guardiacaccia+Noun:guardiacaccia	N00;
guascone+Noun:guascon	N18;
guercio+Adj:guerc	A03;
hindi+Adj:hindi	A00;
imbelle+Adj:imbell	A02;
imposta+Noun:impost	N01;
incomprensione+Noun:incomprension	N11;
infoltimento+Noun:infoltiment	N02;
inorganico+Adj:inorganic	A05;
insanabilità+Noun:insanabilità	N00F;
insidiare+Verb+Trans:insid	V11;
insostituibile+Adj:insostituibil	A02;
interiora+Noun:interiora	N00FPL;
interiore+Adj:interior	A02comp;
laburista+Noun:laburist	N09;
lattiginoso+Adj:lattiginos	A01;
lavoratore+Noun:lavora	N21;
lenocinio+Noun:lenocin	N06;
leonardesco+Adj:leonardesc	A04;
lessicografico+Noun:lessicografic	N05;
letame+Noun:letam	N10;
lied+Noun:lieder	N00MPL;
linfoma+Noun:linfom	N15;
madonnaro+Noun:madonnar	N03;
malaga+Noun:malaga	N00M;
malavoglia+Noun:malavoglia	N00FSG;
malconcio+Adj:malconc	A03;
mammalucco+Noun:mammalucc	N16;
manciù+Adj:manciù	A00;	! was: -ú
mandante+Noun:mandant	N17;
massiccio+Adj:massicc	A03;
massone+Noun:masson	N18;
medium+Noun:medium	N00;
mezzanotte+Noun:mezzanotte	N00FSG;
mezzatinta+Noun:mezzetinte	N00FPL;
mezzofondo+Noun:mezzofondo	N00MSG;
miccia+Noun:micc	N07;
migliaio+Noun:migliai	N14;
migliore+Adj:miglior	A02comp;
mira+Noun:mir	N01;
moglie+Noun:mogl	N13;
monaco+Noun:monac	N19;
monarca+Noun:monarc	N12;
moscovita+Adj:moscovit	A07;
musica+Noun:music	N04;
necrologico+Adj:necrologic	A05;
nereide+Noun:nereid	N11;
neurochirurgo+Noun:neurochirurg	N20;
ninnananna+Noun:ninnananna	N00FSG;
occhietto+Noun:occhiett	N02;
occipitale+Adj:occipital	A02;
oleario+Adj:olear	A06;
omicida+Adj:omicid	A07;
omologo+Adj:omolog	A04;
osmosi+Noun:osmosi	N00F;
ossa+Noun:ossa	N00FPL;
out+Adj:out	A00;
pagliericcio+Noun:pagliericc	N06;
pantaloni+Noun:pantaloni	N00MPL;
panteista+Noun:panteist	N09;
parodiare+Verb+Trans:parod	V11;
pasticciere+Noun:pasticcier	N18;
patriarca+Noun:patriarc	N12;
peggiore+Adj:peggior	A02comp;
pensionante+Noun:pensionant	N17;
peone+Noun:peone	N00MSG;
pescatore+Noun:pesca	N21;
piantagrane+Noun:piantagrane	N00;
plafond+Noun:plafond	N00M;
porcellino+Noun:porcellin	N03;
profugo+Noun:profug	N20;
progressivo+Adj:progressiv	A01;
pugnale+Noun:pugnal	N10;
raccomandato+Adj:raccomandat	A03;
radica+Noun:radic	N04;
reggia+Noun:regg	N07;
rivelatore+Noun:rivela	N21;
royalty+Noun:royalty	N00FSG;
sacco+Noun:sacc	N05;
salgemma+Noun:salgemm	N15;
salvabilità+Noun:salvabilità	N00F;
scavezzacollo+Noun:scavezzacolli	N00MPL;
schermatura+Noun:schermatur	N01;
scooter+Noun:scooter	N00M;
scuoiare+Verb+Trans:scuo	V11;
secondario+Adj:secondar	A06;
semifinalista+Noun:semifinalist	N09;
semiologo+Noun:semiolog	N19;
settecentesco+Adj:settecentesc	A04;
settimino+Noun:settimin	N02;
sintomatico+Adj:sintomatic	A05;
snob+Adj:snob	A00;
sosia+Noun:sosia	N00;
spauracchio+Noun:spauracch	N06;
spilungone+Noun:spilungon	N18;
staio+Noun:stai	N14;
stilizzazione+Noun:stilizzazion	N11;
stoviglie+Noun:stoviglie	N00FPL;
stratega+Noun:strateg	N16;
stuccatore+Noun:stucca	N21;
sunnita+Adj:sunnit	A07;
superficie+Noun:superfic	N13;
superiore+Adj:superior	A02comp;
svanito+Adj:svanit	A01;
tasca+Noun:tasc	N04;
teleabbonato+Noun:teleabbonat	N03;
teste+Noun:test	N17;
tirolese+Adj:tiroles	A02;
tourbillon+Noun:tourbillon	N00M;
transfuga+Noun:transfug	N16;
treccia+Noun:trecc	N07;
tronco+Noun:tronc	N05;
uguagliare+Verb+Trans:uguagl	V11;
utilità+Noun:utilità	N00F;
vapore+Noun:vapor	N10;
vecchio+Adj:vecch	A03;
viario+Adj:viar	A06;
vibrafonista+Noun:vibrafonist	N09;
virago+Noun:virago	N00FSG;
